Hawaii statutes.
ARTICLE 1

MUTUAL
BENEFIT SOCIETIES

Cross References

Assessments of health insurers, see §431:2-216.

PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

§432:1-101 Scope; exemptions. The
provisions of this article shall apply to mutual benefit societies as defined
herein. Except as expressly provided in this article, mutual benefit societies
shall be exempt from the provisions of the insurance code. No law enacted
after July 1, 1988, shall apply to mutual benefit societies unless such
societies are expressly designated therein. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Revision Note

"July 1, 1988," substituted for "the effective
date of this article".

Attorney General Opinions

Based on provision, the requirement of §431:10A-601 as set
forth in §4 of reciprocal beneficiaries act [L 1997, c 383] cannot be
interpreted to apply to mutual benefit societies. Att. Gen. Op. 97-5.

Case Notes

Section 431:15-102 creates an exception to the general rule
established by this section that mutual benefit societies are typically exempt
from provision of the Insurance Code; thus, article 15 of chapter 431 applies
to mutual benefit societies. 99 H. 53, 52 P.3d 823.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next